Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3505
Retaliation or discrimination.

An employer shall not retaliate or discriminate against an employee or applicant because the employee or applicant:

(1) Files a complaint under the Workplace Privacy Act; or

(2) Testifies, assists, or participates in an investigation, proceeding, or action concerning a violation of the act.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 5.